Utah statutes.
63B-7-116.   Publication of resolution or notice -- Limitation on actions to
contest legality.
(1)  The commission may:
(a)  publish any resolution it adopts under this chapter:
(i)  once in a newspaper having general circulation in Utah; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101; or
(b)  in lieu of publishing the entire resolution, publish a notice of bonds to
be issued, titled as such, containing the information required in Subsection
11-14-316(2).
(2) (a)  Any interested person, for 30 days after the date of publication, may
contest:
(i)  the legality of the resolution;
(ii)  any of the bonds authorized under it; or
(iii)  any of the provisions made for the security and repayment of the bonds.
(b)  After 30 days, a person may not contest the legality of the resolution,
any of the bonds authorized under it, or any of the provisions made for the
security and repayment of the bonds for any cause.
